test/src/morphology/N-aqm_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - aʼm: # Noun 152 'eng /est kuub/fin' - full paradigm
     aʼm+N+Sg+Nom: aʼm
     aʼm+N+Sg+Gen: aʼm
     aʼm+N+Sg+Par: aʼmtõ
     aʼm+N+Sg+Dat: aʼmmõn
     aʼm+N+Sg+Ins: aʼmkõks
     aʼm+N+Sg+Ill: aʼmmõ
     aʼm+N+Sg+Ela: aʼmstõ
     aʼm+N+Pl+Nom: aʼmmõd
     aʼm+N+Pl+Gen: aʼmmõd
     aʼm+N+Pl+Par: aʼmmidi
     aʼm+N+Pl+Dat: aʼmmõdõn
     aʼm+N+Pl+Ins: aʼmmõdõks
     aʼm+N+Pl+Ill: aʼmmiž
     aʼm+N+Pl+Ela: aʼmmist
